guesser/guess.nouns.lexicon.lexd
LEXICON NounOblSgLex
ригьи:ригьи[4]      # время
адам:адам[1]
иса:иса[1]
бисси:бисси[1]      # unk
петер:петер[1]
якъуб:якъуб[1]
алкуци:алкуцу[3]
анга:ангало[5]
анжи:анжи[4]
анжи:анжу[4]
анжиди:анжиду[4]
анлъи:анлъио[3]
анччу:анччуо[5]
арком:арком[5]
ахъи:ахъило[5]
ахъу:ахъуо[5]
баба:баба[2]
бакІволуласси:бакІволуласси[4]
баквол:баквол[5]
бара:барало[5]
баркІвол:баркІвол[5]
бархон:бархон[4]
бежун:бежун[5]
бекьи:бекьило[5]
бел:белл[5]
белим:белим[5]
белир:белир[3]
берча:берчу[3]
бесун:бесун[5]
беху:беху[5]
бехун:бехун[5]
беххиркъил:беххиркъил[5]
беххумгъул:беххумгъул[5]
беча:бечу[5]
бешон:бешон[5]
бикІун:бикІун[5]
бил:бил[5]
билъо:билъо[5]
биччин:биччин[5]
бишонни:бишонну[3]
бокьи:бокьило[5]
борцІцІи:борцІцІило[5]
боцІо:боцІу[3]
бочичи:бочичило[5]
бочичи:бочичу[5]
боши:бошило[3]
бугъа:бугъу[3]
бугьу:бугьо[3]
бура:бурало[3]
буртина:буртину[5]
бурчІина:бурчІину[5]
бутІа:бутІало[4]
вацал:вацъал[1]
воцци:воццу[1]
вошо:вошу[1]
вошув-вошо:вошув-вошу[1]
вошуй-йоши:вошуй-йошу[2]
гага:гагу[5]
газа:газа[4]
газа:газало[4]
газа:газу[4]
гама:гаму[5]
гару:гардо[5]
гвай:гвай[5]
гвала:гвалу[5]
гворзу:гворзуло[5]
геду:гедо[3]
гежи:гежо[3]
гиргин:гиргин[4]
гудур:гудур[5]
гужи:гужи[5]
гужи:гужило[5]
гумуги:гумугу[5]
гун:гун[4]
гъадор:гъадор[5]
гъажу:гъажуо[4]
гъайчІа:гъайчІу[3]
гъалай:гъалай[5]
гъан:гъан[5]
гъанни:гъанно[3]
гъацІа:гъацІу[3]
гъвагъвачи:гъвагъвачу[4]
гъвамарссу:гъвамарссу[4]
гъобгъо:гъобгъоло[3]
гъугъу:гъугъо[3]
гъузи:гъузи[5]
гъун:гъун[5]
гьабу:гьабуло[5]
гьабу:гьабуо[5]
гьакъу:гьакъу[4]
гьамкІво:гьамкІволо[5]
гьамку:гьамкуло[5]
гьаморохи:гьамороху[3]
гьантІикІа:гьантІикІу[5]
гьаркІу:гьаркІуло[5]
гьаркьу:гьаркьуло[5]
гьатІи:гьатІи[5]
гьекІа:гьекІа[1]
гьекІва:гьекІва[1]
гьекьим:гьекьим[5]
гьикьим:гьикьим[5]
гьилму:гьилму[4]
гьиму:гьимуло[4]
гьиму:гьимуо[4]
гьин:гьин[5]
гьинкІкІу:гьинккво[3]
гьинкІкІур:гьинкІкІур[4]
гьинцІо:гьинцІо[5]
гьинцІцІу:гьинцІцІу[4]
гьинцІцІу:гьинцІцІуло[4]
гьинцІцІу:гьинцІцІуло[5]
гьир:гьир[5]
гьиро:гьироо[4]
гьиᵸгьиᵸ:гьиᵸгьиᵸло[5]
гьокьийа:гьокьийало[5]
гьокьу:гьокьуло[4]
гьокьу:гьокьуо[4]
гьоли:гьоли[4]
гьон:гьон[4]
гьонно:гьонноло[4]
гьонноххир:гьонноххир[5]
гьону:гьону[4]
гьону:гьонуло[4]
гьорчІин:гьорчІин[3]
гьорчІичол:гьорчІичол[3]
гьорчІчІи:гьорчІчІу[2]
гьума:гьумало[5]
гьунцІцІи:гьунцІцІи[4]
гьунчІа:гьунчІало[4]
дада:дада[1]
дазу:дазуло[5]
дазу:дазуо[5]
дан:дан[3]
дан:дан[5]
дан:данл[5]
даркъгва:даркъгвало[3]
джинджи:джинджо[4]
дум:дум[5]
дунгил:дунгил[5]
жала:жалу[4]
жинна:жинну[5]
жуна:жунало[4]
за:зао[5]
зар:зар[5]
зиву:зивуо[3]
зубу:зубуло[4]
игьа:игьа[4]
игьур:игьур[5]
ила:илу[2]
илъоб:илъоб[5]
има:иму[1]
ингура:ингуру[5]
инква:инква[4]
инккуб:инккуб[5]
инккул:инккул[5]
инцци:инццило[5]
инцциртІа:инцциртІу[5]
инчи:инчи[5]
ирса:ирсу[4]
исиб:исиб[5]
исир:исир[4]
исо:исо[4]
ихвоб:ихводо[4]
ича:ичу[3]
ишкІол:ишкІоло[3]
ишу:ишуло[4]
ишу:ишуо[4]
йавлухъи:йавлухъило[4]
йал:йалл[5]
йацъал:йацъал[2]
йоцци:йоццу[2]
йоши:йошу[2]
йошкІа:йошкІа[2]
йошква:йошква[2]
йошулІи-вошо:йошулІи-вошу[1]
йошулІи-йоши:йошулІи-йошу[2]
кІази:кІази[4]
кІази:кІазило[4]
кІакІу:кІакІуло[4]
кІамур:кІамур[5]
кІатІара:кІатІару[5]
кІекІе:кІекІело[4]
кІикІим:кІикІим[5]
кІинкІи:кІинкІило[4]
кІкІара:кІкІарало[3]
кІкІвой:кІкІвой[5]
кІкІонччу:кІкІонччуло[3]
кІкІуну:кІкІунуло[4]
кІол:кІолло[5]
кІонкьа:кІонкьу[5]
кІонча:кІончу[5]
кІоркІон:кІоркІон[4]
кІоту:кІоту[3]
кІунцІцІи:кІунцІцІо[3]
кІуркІул:кІуркІул[4]
кІурцІцІо:кІурцІцІоло[5]
караки:караку[4]
кванно:кванноло[4]
кванно:кванну[4]
квачІа:квачІало[4]
кво:кволо[4]
квол:кволл[5]
квол:кволо[5]
кволъир:кволъир[4]
квордо:квордо[5]
кворкъин:кворкъин[4]
квоцІи:квоцІило[5]
кечІи:кечІо[4]
кини:кинилло[5]
кицІу:кицІуо[5]
ккуб:ккуб[5]
ккуба:ккубало[4]
ккула:ккулало[5]
кока:коку[5]
кору:кору[5]
кощи:кощи[4]
кули:кулило[5]
кун:кун[3]
кунтІа:кунтІу[1]
куренжи:куренжило[3]
курки:куркило[3]
куртІа:куртІало[4]
куртІа:куртІу[4]
къали:къалило[5]
къаму:къамуо[5]
къаркъала:къаркъалу[5]
къатІипа:къатІипу[3]
къванкъва:къванкъвало[5]
къванкъва:къванкъву[5]
къгантІа:къгантІа[4]
къгантІа:къгантІало[4]
къгантІа:къгантІул[4]
къгасдо:къгасди[5]
къгвакъгвал:къгвакъгвал[4]
къгвон:къгвонл[5]
къгенкъге:къгенкъгело[5]
къгерцІцІи:къгерцІцІо[4]
къгурцІим:къгурцІим[3]
къгурчи:къгурчо[5]
къеб:къебдо[5]
къен:къенно[5]
къиннил:къиннил[5]
къиннилаххуб:къиннилаххуб[5]
къир:къир[5]
къуйло:къуйлоло[5]
къуну:къунуо[5]
къурру:къурро[3]
кьанкІала:кьанкІалу[3]
кьанхил:кьанхил[3]
кье:кье[4]
кьеркьил:кьеркьилу[4]
кьерчІо:кьерчІу[4]
кьетон:кьетон[4]
кьехва:кьехва[5]
кьибдил:кьибдил[4]
кьиму:кьимуло[3]
кьиру:кьирдо[4]
кьуна:кьуна[5]
кьури:кьури[5]
кьучІчІи:кьучІчІило[5]
лІарлІал:лІарлІал[5]
лІурлІа:лІурлІо[4]
лабила:лабилу[3]
лабур:лабуру[5]
лага:лагало[5]
лала:лалало[4]
лала:лалул[4]
лел:лел[5]
лел:лелл[5]
ленссиб:ленссиб[5]
леншур:леншур[4]
лерчол:лерчол[4]
линни:линни[5]
лом:лом[5]
лохво:лохвоо[5]
лъаблъал:лъаблъал[5]
лъаблъал:лъаблъало[5]
лъанцІцІи:лъанцІцІило[3]
лъахиб:лъахиб[5]
лъедир:лъедир[3]
лъенцІцІу:лъенцІцІо[5]
лъин:лъинл[5]
лъиру:лъирдо[4]
лълъен:лълъен[4]
лълъенссо:лълъенссо[4]
лъол:лъолл[5]
лъол:лъоло[5]
лъочІчІу:лъочІчІу[4]
лъочІчІу:лъочІчІуло[4]
лъуди:лъуди[5]
лъуди:лъудило[5]
лъумур:лъумур[5]
магьар:магьар[5]
матІу:матІу[4]
матІу:матІуло[4]
мачу:мачуло[5]
мачу:мачуо[5]
меди:медило[4]
мигажу:мигажуло[4]
мигажу:мигажуо[4]
мигва:мигва[4]
мигва:мигвало[4]
мигъерчІу:мигъерчІу[5]
мигъул:мигъул[5]
мижа:мижало[5]
мийар:мийар[4]
микъгвор:микъгвор[5]
микъи:микъи[5]
милдар:милдар[5]
милки:милкило[4]
милча:милчало[3]
милъи:милъило[5]
милъийол:милъийол[5]
миргъара:миргъарало[5]
миргъара:миргъару[5]
миса:мисало[5]
мисиди:мисидило[5]
мисхъара:мисхъару[3]
михи:михило[4]
михъи:михъило[5]
мицІцІи:мицІцІило[5]
мичІи-гьекьим:мичІи-гьекьим[5]
мичІи:мичІи[5]
мокІво:мокІво[5]
мокІво:мокІволо[5]
мокъго:мокъгу[4]
мокъол:мокъол[5]
мокьи:мокьи[4]
мочІи:мочІи[1]
мочІи:мочІи[2]
мочи:мочи[5]
мукъга:мукъгало[5]
мукъга:мукъгу[5]
мулъа:мулъало[5]
муха:муха[5]
ниду:нидуло[5]
никво:никво[5]
никво:никволо[5]
никку:никку[4]
ниха:нихало[5]
ничІу:ничІуо[3]
ничо:ничоло[5]
ничо:ничоо[5]
нокво:нокво[4]
ноцІцІи:ноцІцІило[3]
нуса:нуса[2]
нусо:нусо[1]
нусхъвор:нусхъвор[5]
онжи:онжило[3]
онххур:онххур[3]
онщи:онщи[4]
орси:орси[5]
ошхъоги:ошхъогу[4]
падан:падан[5]
падучан:падучан[5]
паларси:паларсу[5]
пера:перу[3]
пинжав:пинжав[5]
пирцІцІи:пирцІцІило[5]
пол:полл[5]
пурхул:пурхул[4]
пурхул:пурхуло[4]
рагьал:рагьал[5]
ражи:ражи[5]
ракъгвара:ракъгвару[5]
раххасси:раххассу[4]
реблІа:реблІало[3]
ребццу:ребццуло[4]
ребццу:ребццуо[4]
регъил:регъил[4]
рекІул:рекІул[5]
рекун:рекун[4]
рела:релу[4]
рели:релило[4]
релилІи:релилІу[4]
релъо:релъо[4]
релъоба:релъобало[5]
реси:реси[3]
реххин:реххин[4]
реша:решу[4]
решин:решин[4]
рижи:рижило[4]
рикъгрикъгил:рикъгрикъгил[4]
рикьи:рикьи[5]
риххир:риххир[4]
ричІин:ричІин[4]
рокІво:рокІволо[4]
рокьи:рокьило[5]
рокьочул:рокьочул[4]
рола:ролу[5]
рохъи:рохъилло[5]
рочІчІи:рочІчІило[4]
рошан:рошан[4]
рошо:рошу[5]
ругъун:ругъун[4]
рукьо:рукьо[4]
рукьо:рукьоо[4]
ручол:ручол[5]
салисол:салису[4]
саркьу:саркьо[3]
сейи:сейо[3]
сикъги:сикъгило[4]
сим:сим[5]
ситІа:ситІо[5]
сол:солл[4]
сор:соро[3]
сор:сор[3]
соси:соси[4]
ссагьи:ссагьи[5]
ссакур:ссакур[5]
ссекІу:ссекІуло[5]
ссекІу:ссекІуо[5]
ссим:ссим[5]
ссунтІул:ссунтІул[5]
сур:сур[4]
сусукІу:сусукІу[4]
тІамсса:тІамссу[5]
тІана:тІанало[3]
тІебтІел:тІебтІел[5]
тІентІа:тІентІу[3]
тІонкІил:тІонкІил[4]
тІука:тІуку[3]
тІуши:тІуши[5]
тІуши:тІушило[5]
тай:тай[3]
талирси:талирсу[5]
тибар:тибар[5]
токІщи:токІищу[3]
томил:томил[5]
томшил:томшил[5]
тото:тоту[5]
тускІар:тускІар[5]
унсо:унсу[3]
уххи:уххило[4]
уᵸъецу:уᵸъецу[3]
хвами:хвамило[3]
хво:хво[5]
хвой:хвой[3]
хволо:хвололо[5]
ххвото:ххвотоло[5]
херзим:херзим[4]
хороша:хорош[1]
хубхул:хубхул[4]
хунссир:хунссир[5]
хур:хур[4]
хурши:хурши[4]
хуцІу:хуцІуло[5]
хуцІу:хуцІуо[5]
хуца:хуцало[4]
ххелчаму:ххелчаму[4]
ххин:ххинл[4]
ххубару:ххубару[5]
хъаба:хъаба[5]
хъал:хъал[5]
хъандиру:хъандиру[5]
хъанжар:хъанжар[5]
хъапача:хъапачу[5]
хъачиргъа:хъачиргъу[3]
хъволо:хъвололо[5]
хъиру:хъируо[4]
хъота:хъоту[5]
хъухъадир:хъухъадир[5]
цІа:цІа[4]
цІиву:цІиву[3]
цІил:цІилл[4]
цІул:цІулл[4]
цІумур:цІумур[5]
цІцІа:цІцІа[4]
цІцІа:цІцІало[5]
цІцІакара:цІцІакару[5]
цІцІана:цІцІану[5]
цІцІе:цІцІе[2]
цІцІе:ш[1]
цІцІекІа-лъол:цІцІекІа-лъол[4]
цІцІекІа:цІцІекІу[5]
цІцІекІир:цІцІекІир[3]
цІцІер:цІцІер[4]
цІцІерти:цІцІерти[5]
цІцІийа:цІцІийу[3]
цІцІиком:цІцІиком[5]
цІцІикъу:цІцІикъуо[5]
цІцІиру:цІцІирдо[5]
цІцІон:цІцІон[4]
цІцІуку:цІцІукуо[5]
цІцІума:цІцІуму[5]
цІцІун:цІцІун[3]
цІцІунно:цІцІунноло[4]
цел:целл[5]
ццинаъал:ццинаъал[1]
ццинаъал:ццинаъал[2]
ццула:ццулало[5]
чІабхи:чІабхи[5]
чІами:чІами[4]
чІамчІал:чІамчІал[5]
чІаха:чІахало[5]
чІаъа:чІаъа[4]
чІичІил:чІичІил[5]
чІичІом:чІичІом[4]
чІол:чІоло[4]
чІому:чІомуло[5]
чІому:чІомуо[5]
чІонни:чІоннило[3]
чІор:чІоро[5]
чІора:чІору[3]
чІорбутІи:чІорбутІилло[5]
чІорбутІи:чІорбутІу[5]
чІуйриги:чІуйригу[4]
чІчІартил:чІчІартил[4]
чІчІартил:чІчІартило[4]
чІчІингъа:чІчІингъо[3]
чакмагьи:чакмагьу[5]
чанагъи:чанагъу[4]
чил:чил[4]
чингил-чонгол:чингил-чонгол[5]
чор:чор[3]
чорди-гъанни:чорди-гъанно[3]
чуги:чуги[4]
чукІа:чукІало[5]
чухтІу:чухтІу[5]
шекъе:шекъилло[5]
шен:шен[4]
шен:шен[5]
шинкІи:шинкІило[5]
щекІи:щекІило[5]
щекиб:щекиб[3]
щиб:щиб[5]
щиву:щиву[4]
